Arkansas, session 2025, HB1881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-444(a), concerning the definitions to
be used in relation to the sales tax holiday, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(7)(A) "Menstrual discharge collection devices" means tampons,
panty liners, menstrual cups, pads, and other similar tangible personal
property designed for use in connection with the human menstrual cycle, but
does not include grooming and hygiene products.
(B) "Menstrual discharge collection devices" includes
period underwear and all other items of clothing that are marketed
specifically for use as menstrual discharge collection devices for the human
menstrual cycle, such as period swimwear, period running shorts, and period
sleep shorts;
(8) “Grooming and hygiene products” means soaps and cleaning
solutions, shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan
*JLL226*
03/20/2025 2:37:48 PM JLL226

HB1881
lotions and screens, regardless of whether the items meet the definition of
“over-the-counter-drug”; and
(9) "Over-the-counter-drug" means a drug that contains a label
that identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 C.F.R. § 201.66, as
it existed on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-444(b), concerning the exemptions
from sales and use tax during the sales tax holiday, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7) Menstrual discharge collection devices.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.






















03/20/2025 2:37:48 PM JLL226